Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 31. County Industrial Development Authorities

§ 57-31-1.
Establishment; composition; qualifications, appointment, and terms of office of members.

Any county in the State of Mississippi bordering on the Mississippi-Alabama state line, traversed by the Tombigbee River and in which is situated a senior institution of higher learning under the control of the Board of Trustees of Institutions of Higher Learning of the State of Mississippi, where the board of supervisors of such county shall find and determine that the public convenience and necessity requires the same, as evidenced by a resolution duly adopted and entered on the official minutes of such board, shall establish an industrial development authority, to be known as the industrial development authority of such county. The county industrial development authority shall be composed of seven (7) resident citizens of such county, who shall be qualified electors therein, appointed by the board of supervisors of such county for a term of four (4) years. One (1) member of such authority shall be appointed by the board of supervisors from each of the five (5) supervisors districts of said county, and the remaining two (2) members thereof shall be appointed from the county-at-large by said board of supervisors, from a list of four (4) nominees recommended by a nonprofit industrial development foundation operating within such county. Upon the creation of such authority, the members appointed thereto from supervisor district numbers one (1) and two (2) of such county shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year; the members thereof appointed from supervisor district numbers three (3) and four (4) shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years; the members thereof appointed from the county-at-large shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years; and the members thereof appointed from supervisor district number five (5) shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years. Thereafter, all appointments to such authority shall be for a term of four (4) years, or until a successor is qualified and appointed.

Said authority may, with the approval of the board of supervisors of the county in which the same is situated, authorize appointment of two (2) additional associate members of said authority to be appointed by the board of supervisors of any counties adjacent and contiguous to the county in which such authority is created, to serve without a vote.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 57-31-3.
Oath and bond of members; meetings; compensation of members.

Before entering upon the duties of the office, each member of such authority, except any associate members, shall take and subscribe the oath of office required by Section 268, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, and shall give bond in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), conditioned upon the faithful performance of his duties, such bond to be made payable to the county in which said authority is situated, and to be approved by the board of supervisors of such county. The members of such industrial development authority shall meet at the regular meeting place of the board of supervisors of such county within five (5) days after the members are initially appointed, and shall elect from among their number a president, vice president, and secretary-treasurer of the authority, and shall adopt a seal and such by-laws, rules and regulations as may be necessary to govern the time, place and manner for holding subsequent meetings of the authority and for conduct of its business, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter. The members of said authority shall serve without salary or compensation, provided, however, that their actual expenses incurred in performance of their duties may be reimbursed, including mileage as authorized by law for state employees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 57-31-5.
General powers of authority.

The industrial development authority is hereby expressly authorized and empowered to acquire by gift, purchase or otherwise, and to own, hold, maintain, control and develop real estate situated within the county, either within or without the corporate limits of a municipality for development, use and operation and shall be referred to herein as the “project.” The industrial development authority is further authorized and empowered to engage in works of internal improvement, including, but not limited to, construction or contracting for the construction of streets, roads, railroads, site improvements, water, sewerage, drainage, pollution and other related facilities necessary or required for industrial or commercial use and development within the county, and to acquire, purchase, install, lease, construct, own, hold, equip, control, maintain, use, operate, and repair other structures and facilities necessary and convenient for the planning, development, use, operation and maintenance within the county for industrial or commercial purposes, including, but not limited to, utility installations, elevators, compressors, warehouses, air, rail, and other transportation terminals and pollution control facilities.

The authority is authorized and empowered to sell, lease, trade, exchange or otherwise dispose of industrial sites situated within the county to individuals, firms or corporations, public or private, for industrial or commercial use upon such terms and conditions for consideration and with safeguards as will best promote and protect the public interest, convenience and necessity, and to execute deeds, leases, contracts, easements, and other legal instruments necessary or convenient.

The authority is authorized and empowered to fix and prescribe fees, charges and rates for the use of any water, sewerage, pollution or other facilities constructed and operated within the county and to collect the same from persons, firms and corporations using the same for industrial or commercial purposes.

The authority is authorized and empowered to employ engineers, attorneys, accountants, consultants and such personnel as shall be reasonably necessary to carry out the duties and authority authorized by this chapter.

The authority is expressly authorized and empowered to borrow money and issue negotiable promissory notes evidencing the same under the provisions of Section 57-31-9. In addition to or in lieu of the pledges authorized in Section 57-31-23, the authority may secure such notes by the execution of a deed of trust upon any real estate belonging to the authority not otherwise encumbered.

The enumeration of any specific rights and powers contained herein, and elsewhere in this chapter, where followed by general powers, shall not be construed in a restrictive sense, but rather in as broad and comprehensive a sense as possible to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

Any such sale, lease, trade, exchange or other disposition of industrial sites may be made, completed or executed upon such terms and conditions and for such monetary or other consideration as may be found adequate and approved by the authority in orders or resolutions authorizing the same subject to the provisions of paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection.

In cases involving the lease of industrial sites, any covenants and obligations of the lessee to make expenditures in determined amounts, and within such time or times, for improvements to be erected on the land by such lessee and to conduct thereon industrial operations in such aggregate payroll amounts and for such period of time or times as may be determined by the authority and defined in the transaction documents, and to give preference in employment where practicable to qualified residents of the county, shall, if included in the transaction documents, constitute and be deemed sufficient consideration for the execution of any such transaction document in the absence of a monetary or other considerations. A lease may contain reasonable provisions giving the lessee the right to remove its or his improvements upon termination of the lease.

In cases other than a lease of an industrial site, any covenants and obligations of the grantee to make expenditures in determined amounts, and within such time or times, for improvements to be erected on the land by such grantee and to conduct thereon industrial operations in such aggregate payroll amounts and for such period of time or times as may be determined by the authority and defined in the transaction documents, and to give preference in employment where practicable to qualified residents of the county, shall, if included in the transaction documents, constitute and be deemed sufficient consideration for the execution of any such transaction document in the absence of a monetary or other considerations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 3; Laws, 1976, ch. 429; Laws, 1991, ch. 409, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 554, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 580, § 24; Laws, 2007, ch. 1, 1st Ex Sess, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 11, 2007.).

§ 57-31-7.
Receipt and expenditure of county funds.

The industrial development authority of the county created under the provisions of this chapter is hereby authorized to receive and expend funds from the board of supervisors of such county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 4; Laws, 1991, ch. 409, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 57-31-9.
Issuance of notes or bonds generally.

The authority shall have power and is hereby authorized with the approval and consent of the board of supervisors of such county, at one time or from time to time, to provide by resolution for the issuance of negotiable promissory notes or revenue bonds of the authority to provide funds for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any project authorized by this chapter, but in no event shall the amount of such bonds issued for any project exceed the estimated cost of any such project nor shall the amount of such bonds exceed the amount which can be repaid, together with interest accruing thereon, from funds pledged to said authority under Section 27-39-329. The principal of and the interest on such revenue bonds shall be payable solely from a special fund to be provided for that purpose in the manner hereinafter set forth. Such bonds shall bear date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates, be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times, be redeemable prior to maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the authority; however, such bonds shall mature in annual installments extending not more than thirty (30) years from date thereof. Such bonds shall be signed by the president of the authority, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the authority shall be affixed thereto, attested by the secretary of the authority. The interest coupons, if any, to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of said officers. Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials herein designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers prior to the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to purchaser or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear. Prior to approval being granted by the board for bonds to be issued by the authority, the board shall comply with the provisions of Section 19-9-11. The bonds of any issue shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid; all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity; all interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted; the lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue.

Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%). The denomination, form, and place, or places, of payment of such bonds shall be fixed in the resolution or order of the authority issuing such bonds.

In addition to the other powers and authority granted by this section, the authority is granted the authority, with the approval and consent of the board of supervisors of the county, to provide by resolution for the issuance of a negotiable promissory note in an amount not to exceed Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00) to provide funds for a project described in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii) provided the authority makes a finding that the promissory note will be paid by bonds issued by the board of supervisors of the county. Compliance with the notice provisions of Section 19-9-11 shall not be required for the approval of such promissory note.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 5; Laws, 1985, ch. 477, § 10; Laws, 2004, ch. 424, § 1; Laws, 2007, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved May 11, 2007.).

§ 57-31-11.
Negotiability of bonds and interest coupons; exemption from taxation of bonds.

All revenue bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this chapter shall have and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the Uniform Commercial Code of the State of Mississippi. Such bonds and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation within the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 57-31-13.
Sale of bonds.

The authority may sell such bonds in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi, but no such sale shall be made at a price less than par plus accrued interest to date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser. Notice of the sale of any such bonds shall be published at least one time not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of sale and shall be so published in one (1) or more newspapers published in such county and in one (1) or more other newspapers or financial journals as may be directed by the authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 57-31-15.
Disposition of proceeds of bonds.

The proceeds of such bonds shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of a special fund known as the industrial development authority construction fund, and shall be used solely for payment of the cost of the project except as hereinafter provided, and shall be disbursed upon order of the authority upon such restrictions, if any, as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds may provide. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount required for the purpose for which the bonds were issued, the surplus shall be paid into the fund established for the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 57-31-17.
Validation of bonds.

Such revenue bonds may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, and things which are specified or required by this chapter. The bonds authorized under the authority of this chapter may, in the discretion of the authority, be validated in the chancery court of such county in the manner and with the force and effect as provided by law for the validation of county, municipal, school district, and other bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 57-31-19.
Payment of bonds.

Revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of such county or a pledge of the faith and credit of such county, but such bonds shall be payable solely from the special fund provided therefor as hereinafter set forth, and the issuance of such revenue bonds shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the county to levy or pledge any form of taxation whatever therefor, and all such bonds shall contain recitals on their face substantially covering the foregoing provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 57-31-21.
Contents of bond issue resolution.

The resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds hereunder shall contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may reasonably be proper and not in violation of law, including, but not limited to, covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the acquisition of property, the construction of a project, the maintenance, operation, repair, and insuring of the project, and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys, and may also provide that any project shall be constructed and paid for under the supervision and approval of the consulting engineers or architects employed or designated by the authority, and may also contain provisions concerning the conditions, if any, upon which additional revenue bonds may be issued.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 57-31-23.
Pledge and allocation of revenues, rents, and earnings.

The revenues, rents, and earnings derived from any project, or any and all revenues, rents, and earnings received by the authority unless necessary for operation, maintenance or repair of the project or unless otherwise pledged and allocated, may be pledged and allocated by the authority to the payment of the principal of and interest on the revenue bonds of the authority as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds may provide, and such pledge may include funds received from one or more or all sources and shall be set aside at regular intervals into a sinking fund, which sinking fund shall be pledged to and charged with the payment of:

The interest upon such revenue bonds as such interest shall accrue.

The principal of the bonds as the same shall become due.

The necessary charges of the paying agent or paying agents for paying principal and interest of and on such bonds.

The use and disposition of such sinking fund shall be subject to such regulations as may be provided in the resolution authorizing any issue of revenue bonds. Subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, surplus moneys in the sinking fund may be applied to the purchase or redemption of any of such bonds, and any such bonds so purchased or redeemed shall forthwith be cancelled and shall not again be issued.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 57-31-25.
Enforcement of bondholder’s rights.

Any holder of revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter or of any of the interest coupons pertaining thereto, except to the extent that such rights are not restricted by the resolution directing the issuance of such bonds, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding protect and enforce any and all rights granted hereunder or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this chapter or by any such resolution or by any such lease agreement to be performed by the authority or any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of revenues, rents, and other charges for the use of the project, but no holder of any such bond shall have the right to compel any exercise of taxing power by such county to provide funds to pay any such bonds or the interest thereon, or to enforce the payment thereof against any property of such county, nor shall any such bond constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance, legal or equitable, upon any property of the county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 57-31-27.
Bonds as legal investments and securities.

All bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies, and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 57-31-29.
Exemption from taxation of property of authority.

The carrying out of the corporate purposes of the authority is in all respects for the benefit of the people of such county and is a public purpose, and the authority will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it by this chapter. Hence, any property owned or held by the authority or under its jurisdiction under the provisions of this chapter shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 57-31-31.
Acceptance of grants and contributions.

The authority, in addition to the moneys which may be received by it from the sale of revenue bonds and from the collection of revenues, rents, and earnings derived under the provisions of this chapter, shall have the authority to accept from any public or private agency, or from any individual, grants for or in aid of the construction of any project, or for the payment of bonds, and to receive and accept contributions from any source, of money or property or other things of value to be held, used and applied only for the purposes for which such grants or contributions may be made.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 57-31-33.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers herein granted, but this chapter shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state whereunder projects of the character herein defined may be constructed or financed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 504, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).